Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.31 of Title 21, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Ammunition" means a loaded cartridge or shot shell, case,
primer, projectile, wadding, or propellant powder;
2. "Company" means a for-profit organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, or limited liability company,
Req. No. 10566 Page 1

incl uding a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary,
parent company, or an affiliate of those entities or associations
that exists to make a profit. The term does not include a sole
proprietorship;
3. "Contract" means a promise or set of promises constituting
an agreement between the parties that gives each a legal duty to the
other and also the right to seek a remedy for the breach of those
duties, but does not include an agreement related to investment
services;
4. "Discriminate against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association" means, with respect to the entity or association, to:
a. refuse to engage in the trade of any goods or services
with the entity or association based solely on its
status as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association, which includes the lawful products and
services and lawful practices provided by the firearm
entity or firearm trade association,
b. refrain from continuing an existing business
relationship with the entity or association based
solely on its status as a firearm entity or firearm
trade association, which includes the lawful products
and services and lawful practices provided by the
firearm entity or firearm trade association, or

Req. No. 10566 Page 2

c. terminate an existing business relationship with the
entity or association based solely on its status as a
firearm entity or firearm trade association, which
includes the lawful products and services and lawful
practices provided by the firearm entity or firearm
trade association.
The term does not include the policies of a vendor, merchant,
retail seller, or platform that restrict or prohibit the listing or
selling of ammunition, firearms, or firearm accessories. The term
also does not include a company's refusal to engage in the trade of
any goods or services, decision to refrain from continuing an
existing business relationship, or decision to terminate an existing
business relationship to comply with federal, state, or local laws,
policies, or regulations or a directive by a regulatory agency, or
for any traditional business reason that is specific to the customer
or potential customer and not based solely on the status of an
entity or association as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association, which includes the lawful products and services and
lawful practices provided by the firearm entity or firearm trade
association;
5. "Firearm" means a weapon that expels a projectile by the
action of explosive or expanding gases;
6. "Firearm accessory" means a device specifically designed or
adapted to enable an individual to wear, carry, store, or mount a
Req. No. 10566 Page 3

fire arm on the individual or on a conveyance and an item used in
conjunction with or mounted on a firearm that is not essential to
the basic function of the firearm. The term includes a detachable
firearm magazine;
7. "Firearm entity" means:
a. a firearm, firearm accessory or ammunition
manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, supplier, or
retailer, and
b. a gun range;
8. "Firearm trade association" means any person, corporation,
unincorporated association, federation, business league, or business
organization that:
a. is not organized or operated for profit and for which
none of its net earnings inures to the benefit of any
private shareholder or individual,
b. has two or more firearm entities as members, and
c. is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as an
organization described by Section 501(c) of that code;
9. "Governmental entity" means any branch, department, agency,
or instrumentality of state government, or any official or other
person acting under color of state law, or any political subdivision
of this state; and

Req. No. 10566 Page 4

10. "Sole-source provider" means a supplier who provides goods
or services of a unique nature or goods or services that are solely
available through the supplier and the supplier is the only
practicable source to provide such goods or services.
B. The provisions of this section shall apply only to a
contract that:
1. Is between a governmental entity and a company with at least
ten (10) full-time employees; and
2. Has a value of at least One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) that is paid wholly or partly from public funds of the
governmental entity.
C. Except as provided by subsection D of this section, a
governmental entity may not enter into a contract with a company for
the purchase of goods or services unless the contract contains a
written verification from the company that it:
1. Does not have a practice, policy, guidance, or directive
that discriminates against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association; and
2. Will not discriminate during the term of the contract
against a firearm entity or firearm trade association.
D. The provisions of subsection C of this section shall not
apply to a governmental entity that:
1. Contracts with a sole-source provider; or

Req. No. 10566 Page 5

2. Does not receive a bid from a company that is able to
provide the written verification required by subsection C of this
section.
E. The Central Purchasing Division of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services shall have the authority and responsibility
of reviewing state governmental contracts to confirm that the
required documents of subsection C of this section have been
provided.
F. A government entity shall utilize its current methods of
processing and analyzing the provisions within a contractual
agreement and shall confirm that the required written verification,
provided for in subsection C of this section, has been included and
made a part of the contractual agreement.
G. The provisions of this section shall only apply to financial
institutions that have Fifty Billion Dollars ($50,000,000,000.00) or
more in assets.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10566 GRS 12/28/24





Req. No. 10566 Page 6